Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-102.02
Fire and police departments; rules and regulations; adoption; duty of city council.

All powers and duties connected with and incident to the appointment, removal, government, and discipline of the officers and members of the fire and police departments of any metropolitan city in the State of Nebraska, under such rules and regulations as may be adopted by the city council, shall be vested in and exercised by said council. Rules and regulations for the guidance of the officers and men of said departments, and for the appointment, promotion, removal, trial or discipline of said officers, men and matrons, shall be such as the council shall consider proper and necessary.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. VI, § 1, p. 504;

C.S.1922, § 3701;

C.S.1929, § 14-701;

R.S.1943, § 14-701;

Laws 1961, c. 30, § 8, p. 150;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 14-701.

Under this and other sections in this article, firemen are officers and come under workmen's compensation law, even though receiving pension from city. Shandy v. City of Omaha, 127 Neb. 406, 255 N.W. 477 (1934).